Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.98, is amended to read: 124D.98 LITERACY deleted text begin INCENTIVEdeleted text end AID. Subdivision 1. Literacy deleted text begin incentivedeleted text end aid. A district's literacy deleted text begin incentivedeleted text end aid equals the sum of the deleted text begin proficiency aid under subdivision 2, and the growth aid under subdivision 3deleted text end new text begin basic literacy aid under subdivision 6, English learner literacy aid under subdivision 7, and targeted literacy aid under subdivision 8new text end . new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "English learner concentration factor" means the ratio of: (1) the district's adjusted average daily membership of English learners under section 124D.59, subdivision 2, for the previous fiscal year; to (2) the district's total adjusted average daily membership for the previous fiscal year. new text end new text begin (c) "Poverty concentration factor" means the ratio of: (1) the sum of the number of pupils enrolled in the district eligible to receive free meals, plus one-half of the pupils eligible to receive reduced-priced meals on October 1 of the previous fiscal year; to (2) the number of pupils enrolled in the district on October 1 of the previous fiscal year. new text end deleted text begin Subd. 2. deleted text end deleted text begin Proficiency aid. deleted text end deleted text begin The proficiency aid for each school in a district that has submitted to the commissioner its local literacy plan under section 120B.12, subdivision 4a, is equal to the product of the school's proficiency allowance times the number of third grade pupils at the school on October 1 of the previous fiscal year. A school's proficiency allowance is equal to the percentage of students in each building that meet or exceed proficiency on the third grade reading Minnesota Comprehensive Assessment, averaged across the previous three test administrations, times $530. deleted text end deleted text begin Subd. 3. deleted text end deleted text begin Growth aid. deleted text end deleted text begin The growth aid for each school in a district that has submitted to the commissioner its local literacy plan under section 120B.12, subdivision 4a, is equal to the product of the school's growth allowance times the number of fourth grade pupils enrolled at the school on October 1 of the previous fiscal year. A school's growth allowance is equal to the percentage of students at that school making medium or high growth, under subdivision 4, on the fourth grade reading Minnesota Comprehensive Assessment, averaged across the previous three test administrations, times $530. deleted text end deleted text begin Subd. 4. deleted text end deleted text begin Medium and high growth. deleted text end deleted text begin (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) "Medium growth" is an assessment score within one-half standard deviation above or below the average year-two assessment scores for students with similar year-one assessment scores. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) "High growth" is an assessment score one-half standard deviation or more above the average year-two assessment scores for students with similar year-one assessment scores. deleted text end Subd. 5. Literacy deleted text begin incentivedeleted text end aid uses. A school district must use its literacy deleted text begin incentivedeleted text end aid to deleted text begin support implementation of evidence-based reading instructiondeleted text end new text begin meet the requirements and goals adopted in the district's local literacy plan under section 120B.12, subdivision 4anew text end . deleted text begin The following are eligible uses of literacy incentive aid:deleted text end deleted text begin (1) training for kindergarten through grade 3 teachers, early childhood educators, special education teachers, reading intervention teachers working with students in kindergarten through grade 12, curriculum directors, and instructional support staff that provide reading instruction, on using evidence-based screening and progress monitoring tools; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) evidence-based training using a training program approved by the Department of Education under the Read Act; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) employing or contracting with a literacy lead, as defined in section 120B.119; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) employing an intervention specialist; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) approved screeners, materials, training, and ongoing coaching to ensure reading interventions under section 125A.56, subdivision 1, are evidence-based; deleted text end deleted text begin (6) costs of substitute teachers to allow teachers to complete required training during the teachers' contract day; and deleted text end deleted text begin (7) stipends for teachers completing training required under section 120B.12. deleted text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Basic literacy aid. new text end new text begin (a) A district's basic literacy aid equals the product of: (1) the basic literacy aid allowance; and (2) the district's adjusted average daily membership for kindergarten through grade four for the previous fiscal year. new text end new text begin (b) The basic literacy aid allowance equals $....... for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin English learner literacy aid. new text end new text begin (a) A district's English learner literacy aid equals the product of: (1) the English learner literacy aid allowance; (2) the district's English learner concentration factor; and (3) the district's adjusted average daily membership for kindergarten through grade four for the previous fiscal year. new text end new text begin (b) The English learner literacy aid allowance equals $....... for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Targeted literacy aid. new text end new text begin (a) A district's targeted literacy aid equals the product of: (1) the statewide targeted literacy aid allowance; (2) the district's poverty concentration factor; and (3) the district's adjusted average daily membership for kindergarten through grade four for the previous fiscal year. new text end new text begin (b) The statewide targeted literacy aid allowance equals $....... for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Free and reduced-price meals. new text end new text begin The commissioner must determine the number of children eligible to receive either a free or reduced-price meal on October 1 each year by means of direct certification or through the application for educational benefits. Children enrolled in a district on October 1 and determined to be eligible to receive free or reduced-price meals by December 15 of that school year must be counted as eligible on October 1 for purposes of aid under this section. The commissioner may use federal definitions for these purposes and may adjust these definitions as appropriate. The commissioner may adopt reporting guidelines to assure accuracy of data counts and eligibility. Districts must use any guidelines adopted by the commissioner. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aid payable in fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Literacy aid. new text end new text begin (a) For literacy aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.98: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The 2026 appropriation includes $....... for 2025 and $....... for 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The 2027 appropriation includes $....... for 2026 and $....... for 2027. new text end